Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2898.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Ganado Chapter; waterline project The sum of $980,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Ganado Chapter of the Navajo Nation for construction of a waterline project located in the Ganado Chapter.